Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.130

Modification of order—Notice to law enforcement agency.

Upon application, notice to all parties, and a hearing, the court may modify the terms of an off-limits order. When an order is terminated, modified, or amended before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward, on or before the next judicial day, a true copy of the amended order to the law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of an order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it into an appropriate law enforcement information system.

[ 1989 c 271 s 226.]